Connecticut, session 2026, HB05368.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage): For the purposes of this
section, "deeply affordable housing" means housing that is deed-
restricted for rental or sale to individuals and families for thirty per cent
or less of their annual income, where such income is less than or equal
to forty per cent of the median income of the state. The Department of
Housing shall conduct a study on the availability of deeply affordable
housing in the state. Such study shall examine (1) the availability of such
housing in each county, (2) obstacles to the development of such
housing, (3) the potential effectiveness of a grant program to incentivize
development of such housing, and (4) recommendations for the
development of such grant program. Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Housing shall report the results of such study, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to housing.
LCO No. 2270 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5368
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section